Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB387.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 1102(b) and 1102.1(c) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 1102. Sentence for murder, murder of unborn child and murder of law enforcement officer.* * *(b) Second degree.--Except as provided under section 1102.1, a person who has been convicted of murder of the second degree, of second degree murder of an unborn child or of second degree murder of a law enforcement officer shall be sentenced to a term of [life] imprisonment, the minimum of which shall be at least 25 years.123456789101112131415161718192021 * * *§ 1102.1. Sentence of persons under the age of 18 for murder, murder of an unborn child and murder of a law enforcement officer.* * *(c) Second degree murder.--A person who has been convicted after June 24, 2012, of a murder of the second degree, second degree murder of an unborn child or murder of a law enforcement officer of the second degree and who was under the age of 18 at the time of the commission of the offense shall be sentenced as follows:(1) A person who at the time of the commission of the offense was 15 years of age or older shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment the minimum of which shall be at least [30 years to life] 20 years.(2) A person who at the time of the commission of the offense was under 15 years of age shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment the minimum of which shall be at least [20 years to life] 15 years.* * *Section 2. Section 6137(a)(1) and (3) of Title 61 are amended to read:§ 6137. Parole power.(a) General criteria for parole.--(1) The board may parole subject to consideration of guidelines established under 42 Pa.C.S. § 2154.5 (relating to adoption of guidelines for parole) or subject to section 6137.1 (relating to short sentence parole) and such information developed by or furnished to the board under section 6174 (relating to right of access to offenders), or 20250SB0387PN0332 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 both, and may release on parole any offender to whom the power to parole is granted to the board by this chapter, except an offender condemned to death or serving life imprisonment for first degree murder, whenever in its opinion:(i) The best interests of the offender justify or require that the offender be paroled.(ii) It does not appear that the interests of the Commonwealth will be injured by the offender's parole.* * *(3) The power to parole granted under this section to the board may not be exercised in the board's discretion at any time before, but only after, the expiration of the minimum term of imprisonment fixed by the court in its sentence or by the Board of Pardons in a sentence which has been reduced by commutation[.], subject to the following:(i) Notwithstanding 42 Pa.C.S. § 9757 (relating to consecutive sentences of total confinement for multiple offenses) and except for an incarcerated person sentenced to life imprisonment under 42 Pa.C.S. § 9711 (relating to sentencing procedure for murder of the first degree), in the case of an incarcerated person sentenced to life imprisonment, the board may grant parole only after a period of at least 25 years has elapsed since the beginning date of the incarceration of the incarcerated person.(ii) Notwithstanding 42 Pa.C.S. § 9757, in the case of an incarcerated person sentenced under 18 Pa.C.S. § 1102.1(c)(1) (relating to sentence of persons under the age of 18 for murder, murder of an unborn child and 20250SB0387PN0332 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 murder of a law enforcement officer), the board may grant parole only after a period of at least 20 years has elapsed since the beginning date of the incarceration of the incarcerated person.(iii) Notwithstanding 42 Pa.C.S. § 9757, in the case of an incarcerated person sentenced under 18 Pa.C.S. § 1102.1(c)(2), the board may grant parole only after a period of at least 15 years has elapsed since the beginning date of the incarceration of the incarcerated person.(iv) Before parole may be granted under subparagraph (i), (ii) or (iii), the board must give primary consideration to the protection of the public and to victim safety.(v) In addition to the considerations required under 42 Pa.C.S. § 2154.5, when determining whether to grant parole under subparagraph (i), (ii) or (iii), the board shall consider the level of culpability of the person in the underlying murder, including whether the person directly caused or intended to cause a death.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0387PN0332 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122